Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/eo_affix.dat
SFX G Y 335
SFX G   a     igis        a
SFX G   a     igas        a
SFX G   a     igos        a
SFX G   a     igu         a
SFX G   a     igus        a
SFX G   a     iginta      a
SFX G   a     igintaj     a
SFX G   a     igintajn    a
SFX G   a     igintan     a
SFX G   a     iginte      a
SFX G   a     igint'      a
SFX G   a     iginto      a
SFX G   a     igintoj     a
SFX G   a     igintojn    a
SFX G   a     iginton     a
SFX G   a     iganta      a
SFX G   a     igantaj     a
SFX G   a     igantajn    a
SFX G   a     igantan     a
SFX G   a     igante      a
SFX G   a     igant'      a
SFX G   a     iganto      a
SFX G   a     igantoj     a
SFX G   a     igantojn    a
SFX G   a     iganton     a
SFX G   a     igonta      a
SFX G   a     igontaj     a
SFX G   a     igontajn    a
SFX G   a     igontan     a
SFX G   a     igonte      a
SFX G   a     igont'      a
SFX G   a     igonto      a
SFX G   a     igontoj     a
SFX G   a     igontojn    a
SFX G   a     igonton     a
SFX G   a     igo         a
SFX G   a     igoj        a
SFX G   a     igojn       a
SFX G   a     igon        a
SFX G   a     iga         a
SFX G   a     igaj        a
SFX G   a     igajn       a
SFX G   a     igan        a
SFX G   a     ige         a
SFX G   a     igi         a
SFX G   a     igita       a
SFX G   a     igitaj      a
SFX G   a     igitajn     a
SFX G   a     igitan      a
SFX G   a     igite       a
SFX G   a     igito       a
SFX G   a     igitoj      a
SFX G   a     igitojn     a
SFX G   a     igiton      a
SFX G   a     igata       a
SFX G   a     igataj      a
SFX G   a     igatajn     a
SFX G   a     igatan      a
SFX G   a     igate       a
SFX G   a     igat'       a
SFX G   a     igato       a
SFX G   a     igatoj      a
SFX G   a     igatojn     a
SFX G   a     igaton      a
SFX G   a     igota       a
SFX G   a     igotaj      a
SFX G   a     igotajn     a
SFX G   a     igotan      a
SFX G   a     igote       a
SFX G   a     igoto       a
SFX G   a     igotoj      a
SFX G   a     igotojn     a
SFX G   a     igoton      a
SFX G   a     igeblas     a
SFX G   a     igeblis     a
SFX G   a     igeblos     a
SFX G   a     igeblus     a
SFX G   a     igebla      a
SFX G   a     igeblaj     a
SFX G   a     igeblajn    a
SFX G   a     igeblan     a
SFX G   a     igeble      a
SFX G   a     igeblo      a
SFX G   a     igebloj     a
SFX G   a     igeblojn    a
SFX G   a     igeblon     a
SFX G   a     igendas     a
SFX G   a     igendis     a
SFX G   a     igendos     a
SFX G   a     igendus     a
SFX G   a     igenda      a
SFX G   a     igendaj     a
SFX G   a     igendajn    a
SFX G   a     igendan     a
SFX G   a     igende      a
SFX G   a     igendo      a
SFX G   a     igendoj     a
SFX G   a     igendojn    a
SFX G   a     igendon     a
SFX G   a     igad'       a
SFX G   a     igado       a
SFX G   a     igadoj      a
SFX G   a     igadojn     a
SFX G   a     igadon      a
SFX G   a     igadis      a
SFX G   a     igadas      a
SFX G   a     igados      a
SFX G   a     igadu       a
SFX G   a     igadus      a
SFX G   a     igada       a
SFX G   a     igadaj      a
SFX G   a     igadajn     a
SFX G   a     igadan      a
SFX G   a     igade       a
SFX G   a     igadi       a
SFX G   0     gad'        i
SFX G   0     gado        i
SFX G   0     gadoj       i
SFX G   0     gadojn      i
SFX G   0     gadon       i
SFX G   0     gadis       i
SFX G   0     gadas       i
SFX G   0     gados       i
SFX G   0     gadu        i
SFX G   0     gadus       i
SFX G   0     gada        i
SFX G   0     gadaj       i
SFX G   0     gadajn      i
SFX G   0     gadan       i
SFX G   0     gade        i
SFX G   0     gadi        i
SFX G   0     gis         i
SFX G   0     gas         i
SFX G   0     gos         i
SFX G   0     gu          i
SFX G   0     gus         i
SFX G   0     ginta       i
SFX G   0     gintaj      i
SFX G   0     gintajn     i
SFX G   0     gintan      i
SFX G   0     ginte       i
SFX G   0     gint'       i
SFX G   0     ginto       i
SFX G   0     gintoj      i
SFX G   0     gintojn     i
SFX G   0     ginton      i
SFX G   0     ganta       i
SFX G   0     gantaj      i
SFX G   0     gantajn     i
SFX G   0     gantan      i
SFX G   0     gante       i
SFX G   0     gant'       i
SFX G   0     ganto       i
SFX G   0     gantoj      i
SFX G   0     gantojn     i
SFX G   0     ganton      i
SFX G   0     g'          i
SFX G   0     go          i
SFX G   0     goj         i
SFX G   0     gojn        i
SFX G   0     gon         i
SFX G   0     ga          i
SFX G   0     gaj         i
SFX G   0     gajn        i
SFX G   0     gan         i
SFX G   0     ge          i
SFX G   0     gi          i
SFX G   0     gita        i
SFX G   0     gitaj       i
SFX G   0     gitajn      i
SFX G   0     gitan       i
SFX G   0     gite        i
SFX G   0     gito        i
SFX G   0     gitoj       i
SFX G   0     gitojn      i
SFX G   0     giton       i
SFX G   0     gata        i
SFX G   0     gataj       i
SFX G   0     gatajn      i
SFX G   0     gatan       i
SFX G   0     gate        i
SFX G   0     gato        i
SFX G   0     gatoj       i
SFX G   0     gatojn      i
SFX G   0     gaton       i
SFX G   0     gota        i
SFX G   0     gotaj       i
SFX G   0     gotajn      i
SFX G   0     gotan       i
SFX G   0     gote        i
SFX G   0     goto        i
SFX G   0     gotoj       i
SFX G   0     gotojn      i
SFX G   0     goton       i
SFX G   0     geblas      i
SFX G   0     geblis      i
SFX G   0     geblos      i
SFX G   0     geblus      i
SFX G   0     gebla       i
SFX G   0     geblaj      i
SFX G   0     geblajn     i
SFX G   0     geblan      i
SFX G   0     geble       i
SFX G   0     geblo       i
SFX G   0     gebloj      i
SFX G   0     geblojn     i
SFX G   0     geblon      i
SFX G   0     gendas      i
SFX G   0     gendis      i
SFX G   0     gendos      i
SFX G   0     gendus      i
SFX G   0     genda       i
SFX G   0     gendaj      i
SFX G   0     gendajn     i
SFX G   0     gendan      i
SFX G   0     gende       i
SFX G   0     gendo       i
SFX G   0     gendoj      i
SFX G   0     gendojn     i
SFX G   0     gendon      i
SFX G   o     igis        o
SFX G   o     igas        o
SFX G   o     igos        o
SFX G   o     igu         o
SFX G   o     igus        o
SFX G   o     iginta      o
SFX G   o     igintaj     o
SFX G   o     igintajn    o
SFX G   o     igintan     o
SFX G   o     iginte      o
SFX G   o     igint'      o
SFX G   o     iginto      o
SFX G   o     igintoj     o
SFX G   o     igintojn    o
SFX G   o     iginton     o
SFX G   o     iganta      o
SFX G   o     igantaj     o
SFX G   o     igantajn    o
SFX G   o     igantan     o
SFX G   o     igante      o
SFX G   o     igant'      o
SFX G   o     iganto      o
SFX G   o     igantoj     o
SFX G   o     igantojn    o
SFX G   o     iganton     o
SFX G   o     igonta      o
SFX G   o     igontaj     o
SFX G   o     igontajn    o
SFX G   o     igontan     o
SFX G   o     igonte      o
SFX G   o     igont'      o
SFX G   o     igonto      o
SFX G   o     igontoj     o
SFX G   o     igontojn    o
SFX G   o     igonton     o
SFX G   o     igo         o
SFX G   o     igoj        o
SFX G   o     igojn       o
SFX G   o     igon        o
SFX G   o     iga         o
SFX G   o     igaj        o
SFX G   o     igajn       o
SFX G   o     igan        o
SFX G   o     ige         o
SFX G   o     igi         o
SFX G   o     igita       o
SFX G   o     igitaj      o
SFX G   o     igitajn     o
SFX G   o     igitan      o
SFX G   o     igite       o
SFX G   o     igito       o
SFX G   o     igitoj      o
SFX G   o     igitojn     o
SFX G   o     igiton      o
SFX G   o     igata       o
SFX G   o     igataj      o
SFX G   o     igatajn     o
SFX G   o     igatan      o
SFX G   o     igate       o
SFX G   o     igat'       o
SFX G   o     igato       o
SFX G   o     igatoj      o
SFX G   o     igatojn     o
SFX G   o     igaton      o
SFX G   o     igota       o
SFX G   o     igotaj      o
SFX G   o     igotajn     o
SFX G   o     igotan      o
SFX G   o     igote       o
SFX G   o     igoto       o
SFX G   o     igotoj      o
SFX G   o     igotojn     o
SFX G   o     igoton      o
SFX G   o     igeblas     o
SFX G   o     igeblis     o
SFX G   o     igeblos     o
SFX G   o     igeblus     o
SFX G   o     igebla      o
SFX G   o     igeblaj     o
SFX G   o     igeblajn    o
SFX G   o     igeblan     o
SFX G   o     igeble      o
SFX G   o     igeblo      o
SFX G   o     igebloj     o
SFX G   o     igeblojn    o
SFX G   o     igeblon     o
SFX G   o     igendas     o
SFX G   o     igendis     o
SFX G   o     igendos     o
SFX G   o     igendus     o
SFX G   o     igenda      o
SFX G   o     igendaj     o
SFX G   o     igendajn    o
SFX G   o     igendan     o
SFX G   o     igende      o
SFX G   o     igendo      o
SFX G   o     igendoj     o
SFX G   o     igendojn    o
SFX G   o     igendon     o
SFX G   o     igad'       o
SFX G   o     igado       o
SFX G   o     igadoj      o
SFX G   o     igadojn     o
SFX G   o     igadon      o
SFX G   o     igadis      o
SFX G   o     igadas      o
SFX G   o     igados      o
SFX G   o     igadu       o
SFX G   o     igadus      o
SFX G   o     igada       o
SFX G   o     igadaj      o
SFX G   o     igadajn     o
SFX G   o     igadan      o
SFX G   o     igade       o
SFX G   o     igadi       o

SFX H N 24
SFX H   a     uja         a
SFX H   a     ujaj        a
SFX H   a     ujajn       a
SFX H   a     ujan        a
SFX H   a     ujo         a
SFX H   a     ujoj        a
SFX H   a     ujojn       a
SFX H   a     ujon        a
SFX H   i     uja         i
SFX H   i     ujaj        i
SFX H   i     ujajn       i
SFX H   i     ujan        i
SFX H   i     ujo         i
SFX H   i     ujoj        i
SFX H   i     ujojn       i
SFX H   i     ujon        i
SFX H   o     uja         o
SFX H   o     ujaj        o
SFX H   o     ujajn       o
SFX H   o     ujan        o
SFX H   o     ujo         o
SFX H   o     ujoj        o
SFX H   o     ujojn       o
SFX H   o     ujon        o
